Maryland, session 2026, SB0443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
2–201.
(a) (1) There is a county board of elections in each county of the State.
2–205.
(a) Each local board may appoint or retain as counsel an individual who is:
(1) a registered voter of [its county] THE STATE; and
(2) admitted to practice law in the State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 1 –